Connecticut, session 2026, HB05397.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Subparagraph (C) of subdivision (6) of subsection (c) of
section 7-148 of the general statutes is repealed and the following is
substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(C) (i) Lay out, construct, reconstruct, alter, maintain, repair, control,
operate, and assign numbers to streets, alleys, highways, boulevards,
bridges, underpasses, sidewalks, curbs, gutters, public walks and
parkways;
(ii) Keep open and safe for public use and travel and free from
encroachment or obstruction the streets, sidewalks and public places in
the municipality;
(iii) Control the excavation of highways and streets;
(iv) Regulate and prohibit the excavation, altering or opening of
sidewalks, public places and grounds for public and private purposes
LCO No. 2026 1 of 2

Raised Bill No. 5397
and the location of any work or things thereon, whether temporary or
permanent, upon or under the surface thereof;
(v) Require owners or occupants of land adjacent to any sidewalk or
public work to remove snow, ice, sleet, debris or any other obstruction
therefrom, provide penalties upon their failure to do so, and cause such
snow, ice, sleet, debris or other obstruction to be removed and make the
cost of such removal a lien on such property;
(vi) Grant to abutting property owners a limited property or
leasehold interest in abutting streets and sidewalks for the purpose of
encouraging and supporting private commercial development;
(vii) Regulate and prohibit the excavation, altering or opening of
stone walls within the rights-of-way of highways or streets;
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 7-148(c)(6)(C)